Maine, session 132, LD631.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-A MRSA §1358 is enacted to read:
§1358. Home distillery establishments
1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following
meanings.
A. "Home distillery" means a distillery located in a dwelling or on property connected
with a dwelling, including, but not limited to, a shed, yard or enclosure. For purposes
of this paragraph, "dwelling" means a residential structure, including, but not limited
to, a house, individual condominium unit, mobile home or trailer, if it is used as a
residence.
B. "Mash capacity" means the volume of a mash tun, which is the vessel used to mix
crushed grains and water to begin the brewing process.
C. "Proof gallon" means one liquid gallon of spirits that is 50% alcohol at 60 degrees
Fahrenheit.
2. Personal use allowed. Notwithstanding chapter 83, the owner of a home distillery
may produce distilled spirits solely for personal use, including, but not limited to, personal
consumption or serving the product to the owner's family members and guests to be
consumed on the premises where the home distillery is located.
3. Prohibitions. The owner of a home distillery may not:
A. Have on the premises of the home distillery stills or distilling apparatuses that have
a mash capacity of more than 15.5 gallons;
B. Produce more than 24 proof gallons of distilled spirits per person 21 years of age
or older residing on the premises where the home distillery is located in a calendar
year;
C. Produce more than 48 proof gallons in a calendar year; or
Page 1 - 132LR0842(03)

D. Sell or offer for sale any spirits produced in the home distillery.
4. Violation. Violation of this section is a Class E crime.
Page 2 - 132LR0842(03)